West Virginia, session 2026, HB4757.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 1D. Establishing Privacy Regarding Medical Treatments. §16-1D-1. Prohibiting compulsory or mandatory medical treatment unless the manufacturer of the medical product is liable. Notwithstanding any other law, a person may not be required to take, be administered, or otherwise receive or disclose whether the person has taken, been administered, or otherwise received a medical product unless the manufacturer of the medical product is liable for any death or serious injury caused by the medical product. For purposes of this section, a "medical product" means any medical device, drug, or biologic.